Hawaii statutes.
§432E-36 External review of experimental or
investigational treatment adverse determinations. (a) An enrollee or an
enrollee's appointed representative may file a request for an external review
with the commissioner within one hundred thirty days of receipt of notice of an
adverse action that involves a denial of coverage based on a determination that
the health care service or treatment recommended or requested is experimental
or investigational.

(b) An enrollee or the enrollee's appointed
representative may make an oral request for an expedited external review of the
adverse action if the enrollee's treating physician or advanced practice
registered nurse certifies, in writing, that the health care service or
treatment that is the subject of the request would be significantly less
effective if not promptly initiated. A written request for an expedited
external review pursuant to this subsection shall include, and oral request
shall be promptly followed by, a certification signed by the enrollee's treating
physician or treating advanced practice registered nurse and the authorization
for release and disclosures required by section 432E-33. Upon receipt of all
items required by this subsection, the commissioner shall immediately notify
the health carrier.

(c) Upon notice of the request for expedited
external review, the health carrier shall immediately determine whether the
request meets the requirements of subsection (b). The health carrier shall
immediately notify the commissioner, the enrollee, and the enrollee's appointed
representative of its eligibility determination.

Notice of eligibility for expedited external
review pursuant to this subsection shall include a statement informing the
enrollee and, if applicable, the enrollee's appointed representative that a
health carrier's initial determination that the external review request is
ineligible for review may be appealed to the commissioner.

(d) Upon receipt of a request for appeal
pursuant to subsection (c), the commissioner shall review the request for
external review submitted by the enrollee pursuant to subsection (a), determine
whether an enrollee is eligible for external review and, if eligible, shall
refer the enrollee to external review. The commissioner's determination of
eligibility for external review shall be made in accordance with the terms of
the enrollee's health benefit plan and all applicable provisions of this part.
If an enrollee is not eligible for external review, the commissioner shall
notify the enrollee, the enrollee's appointed representative, and the health
carrier of the reason for ineligibility within three business days.

(e) Upon receipt of the notice pursuant to
subsection (a) or a determination of the commissioner pursuant to subsection
(d) that the enrollee meets the eligibility requirements for expedited external
review, the commissioner shall immediately randomly assign an independent
review organization to conduct the expedited external review from the list of
approved independent review organizations qualified to conduct the external
review, based on the nature of the health care service that is the subject of
the adverse action and other factors determined by the commissioner including
conflicts of interest pursuant to section 432E-43, compiled and maintained by
the commissioner to conduct the external review and immediately notify the
health carrier of the name of the assigned independent review organization.

(f) Upon receipt of the notice from the
commissioner of the name of the independent review organization assigned to
conduct the expedited external review, the health carrier or its designee
utilization review organization shall provide or transmit all documents and
information it considered in making the adverse action that is the subject of
the expedited external review to the assigned independent review organization
electronically or by telephone, facsimile, or any other available expeditious
method.

(g) Except for a request for an expedited
external review made pursuant to subsection (b), within three business days
after the date of receipt of the request, the commissioner shall notify the
health carrier that the enrollee has requested an expedited external review
pursuant to this section. Within five business days following the date of
receipt of notice, the health carrier shall determine whether:

(1) The individual is or was an enrollee in the
health benefit plan at the time the health care service or treatment was
recommended or requested or, in the case of a retrospective review, was an
enrollee in the health benefit plan at the time the health care service or
treatment was provided;

(2) The recommended or requested health care service
or treatment that is the subject of the adverse action:

(A) Would be a covered benefit under the
enrollee's health benefit plan but for the health carrier's determination that
the service or treatment is experimental or investigational for the enrollee's
particular medical condition; and

(B) Is not explicitly listed as an excluded
benefit under the enrollee's health benefit plan;

(3) The enrollee's treating physician or treating
advanced practice registered nurse has certified in writing that:

(A) Standard health care services or
treatments have not been effective in improving the condition of the enrollee;

(B) Standard health care services or
treatments are not medically appropriate for the enrollee; or

(C) There is no available standard health care
service or treatment covered by the health carrier that is more beneficial than
the health care service or treatment that is the subject of the adverse action;

(4) The enrollee's treating physician or treating
advanced practice registered nurse:

(A) Has recommended a health care service or
treatment that the physician or advanced practice registered nurse certifies,
in writing, is likely to be more beneficial to the enrollee, in the physician's
or advanced practice registered nurse's opinion, than any available standard
health care services or treatments; or

(B) Who is a licensed, board certified or
board eligible physician qualified to practice in the area of medicine
appropriate to treat the enrollee's condition, or who is an advanced practice
registered nurse qualified to treat the enrollee's condition, has certified in
writing that scientifically valid studies using accepted protocols demonstrate
that the health care service or treatment that is the subject of the adverse
action is likely to be more beneficial to the enrollee than any available
standard health care services or treatments;

(5) The enrollee has exhausted the health carrier's
internal appeals process or the enrollee is not required to exhaust the health
carrier's internal appeals process pursuant to section 432E-33(b); and

(6) The enrollee has provided all the information and
forms required by the commissioner that are necessary to process an external
review, including the release form and disclosure of conflict of interest
information as provided under section 432E‑33(a).

(h) Within three business days after
determining the enrollee's eligibility for external review pursuant to
subsection (g), the health carrier shall notify the commissioner, the enrollee,
and the enrollee's appointed representative in writing as to whether the
request is complete and eligible for external review.

If the request is not complete, the health
carrier shall inform the commissioner, the enrollee, and the enrollee's
appointed representative in writing of the information or materials needed to
complete the request.

If the enrollee is not eligible for external review
pursuant to subsection (g), the health carrier shall inform the commissioner,
the enrollee, and the enrollee's appointed representative in writing of the
ineligibility and the reasons for ineligibility.

Notice of ineligibility pursuant to this subsection
shall include a statement informing the enrollee and the enrollee's appointed
representative that a health carrier's initial determination that the external
review request is ineligible for review may be appealed to the commissioner by
submitting a request to the commissioner.

If a request for external review is determined
eligible for external review, the health carrier shall notify the commissioner
and the enrollee and, if applicable, the enrollee's appointed representative.

(i) Upon receipt of a request for appeal
pursuant to subsection (h), the commissioner shall review the request for
external review submitted pursuant to subsection (a) and, if eligible, shall
refer the enrollee for external review. The commissioner's determination of
eligibility for expedited external review shall be made in accordance with the
terms of the enrollee's health benefit plan and all applicable provisions of
this part. If an enrollee is not eligible for external review, the
commissioner shall notify the enrollee, the enrollee's appointed
representative, and the health carrier of the reasons for ineligibility within
three business days.

(j) When the commissioner receives notice
pursuant to subsection (h) or makes a determination pursuant to subsection (i)
that an enrollee is eligible for external review, within three business days
after receipt of the notice or determination of eligibility, the commissioner
shall:

(1) Randomly assign an independent review
organization from the list of approved independent review organizations
qualified to conduct the external review, based on the nature of the health
care service that is the subject of the adverse action and other factors
determined by the commissioner including conflicts of interest pursuant to
section 432E-43, compiled and maintained by the [commissioner to] conduct the
external review and notify the health carrier of the name of the assigned
independent review organization; and

(2) Notify the enrollee and the enrollee's appointed
representative, in writing, of the enrollee's eligibility and acceptance for
external review.

(k) An enrollee or an enrollee's appointed
representative may submit additional information in writing to the assigned
independent review organization for consideration in its external review. The
independent review organization shall consider information submitted within
five business days following the date of the enrollee's receipt of the notice
provided pursuant to subsection (j). The independent review organization may
accept and consider additional information submitted by an enrollee after five
business days.

(l) Within five business days after the date
of receipt of notice pursuant to subsection (j), the health carrier or its
designated utilization review organization shall provide to the assigned
independent review organization all documents and information it considered in
issuing the adverse action that is the subject of external review. Failure by
the health carrier or its utilization review organization to provide the
documents and information within five business days shall not delay the conduct
of the external review; provided that the assigned independent review
organization may terminate the external review and reverse the adverse action
that is the subject of the external review. The independent review
organization shall notify the enrollee, the enrollee's appointed
representative, the health carrier, and the commissioner within three business
days of the termination of an external review and reversal of an adverse action
pursuant to this subsection.

(m) Within three business days after the
receipt of the notice of assignment to conduct the external review pursuant to
subsection (j), the assigned independent review organization shall:

(1) Select one or more clinical reviewers who each
shall be a physician or other health care professional who meets the minimum
qualifications described in section 432E-39 and, through clinical experience in
the past three years, is an expert in the treatment of the enrollee's condition
and knowledgeable about the recommended or requested health care service or
treatment to conduct the external review; provided that neither the enrollee,
the enrollee's appointed representative, nor the health carrier shall choose or
control the choice of the physicians or other health care professionals to be
selected to conduct the external review; and

(2) Based on the written opinion of the clinical
reviewer, or opinions if more than one clinical reviewer has been selected, to
the assigned independent review organization on whether the recommended or
requested health care service or treatment should be covered, make a
determination to uphold or reverse the adverse action.

In reaching an opinion, the clinical reviewers
are not bound by any decisions or conclusions reached during the health
carrier's utilization review process or internal appeals process.

Each clinical reviewer selected pursuant to
this subsection shall review all of the information and documents received
pursuant to subsection (l) and any other information submitted in writing by
the enrollee or the enrollee's authorized representative pursuant to this
subsection.

(n) The assigned independent review
organization, within one business day of receipt by the independent review
organization, shall forward all information received from the enrollee pursuant
to subsection (k) to the health carrier. Upon receipt of information forwarded
to it pursuant to this subsection, a health carrier may reconsider the adverse
action that is the subject of the external review; provided that
reconsideration by the health carrier shall not delay or terminate an external
review unless the health carrier reverses its adverse action and provides
coverage or payment for the health care service that is the subject of the
adverse action. The health carrier shall notify the enrollee, the enrollee's
appointed representative, the assigned independent review organization, and the
commissioner in writing of its decision to reverse its adverse action and
within three business days of making its decision to reverse the adverse action
and provide coverage. The assigned independent review organization shall
terminate its external review upon receipt of notice pursuant to this
subsection from the health carrier.

(o) Except as provided in subsection (p),
within twenty days after being selected to conduct the external review, a
clinical reviewer shall provide an opinion to the assigned independent review
organization pursuant to subsection (q) regarding whether the recommended or requested
health care service or treatment subject to an appeal pursuant to this section
shall be covered.

The clinical [reviewer's] opinion shall be in
writing and shall include:

(1) A description of the enrollee's medical
condition;

(2) A description of the indicators relevant to
determining whether there is sufficient evidence to demonstrate that the
recommended or requested health care service or treatment is more likely than
not to be more beneficial to the enrollee than any available standard health
care services or treatments and whether the adverse risks of the recommended or
requested health care service or treatment would not be substantially increased
over those of available standard health care services or treatments;

(3) A description and analysis of any medical or
scientific evidence, as that term is defined in section 432E-1.4, considered in
reaching the opinion;

(4) A description and analysis of any medical
necessity criteria defined in section 432E-1; and

(5) Information on whether the reviewer's rationale
for the opinion is based on approval of the health care service or treatment by
the federal Food and Drug Administration for the condition or medical or
scientific evidence or evidence-based standards that demonstrate that the
expected benefits of the recommended or requested health care service or
treatment is likely to be more beneficial to the enrollee than any available
standard health care services or treatments and the adverse risks of the
recommended or requested health care service or treatment would not be
substantially increased over those of available standard health care services
or treatments.

(p) Notwithstanding the requirements of
subsection (o), in an expedited external review, the clinical reviewer shall
provide an opinion orally or in writing to the assigned independent review
organization as expeditiously as the enrollee's medical condition or
circumstances require, but in no event more than five calendar days after being
selected in accordance with subsection (m).

If the opinion provided pursuant to this
subsection was not in writing, within forty-eight hours following the date the
opinion was provided, the clinical reviewer shall provide written confirmation
of the opinion to the assigned independent review organization and include the
information required under subsection (o).

(q) In addition to the documents and
information provided pursuant to subsection (b) or (l), a clinical reviewer may
consider the following in reaching an opinion pursuant to subsection (o):

(1) The enrollee's pertinent medical records;

(2) The attending physician's or health care
professional's recommendation;

(3) Consulting reports from appropriate health care
professionals and other documents submitted by the health carrier, enrollee, the
enrollee's appointed representative, or the enrollee's treating physician or
health care professional; and

(4) Whether:

(A) The recommended health care service or
treatment has been approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration, if
applicable, for the condition; or

(B) Medical or scientific evidence or
evidence-based standards demonstrate that the expected benefits of the
recommended or requested health care service or treatment is more likely than
not to be beneficial to the enrollee than any available standard health care
service or treatment and the adverse risks of the recommended or requested
health care service or treatment would not be substantially increased over
those of available standard health care services or treatments;

provided that the independent review organization's
decision shall not contradict the terms of the enrollee's health benefit plan
or the provisions of this chapter.

(r) Except as provided in subsection (s),
within twenty days after the date it receives the opinion of the clinical
reviewer pursuant to subsection (o), the assigned independent review
organization, in accordance with subsection (t), shall determine whether the
health care service at issue in an external review pursuant to this section
shall be a covered benefit and shall notify the enrollee, the enrollee's
appointed representative, the health carrier, and the commissioner of its
determination. The independent review organization shall include in the notice
of its decision:

(1) A general description of the reason for the
request for external review;

(2) The written opinion of each clinical reviewer,
including the recommendation of each clinical reviewer as to whether the
recommended or requested health care service or treatment should be covered and
the rationale for the reviewer's recommendation;

(3) The date the independent review organization was
assigned by the commissioner to conduct the external [review];

(4) The date the external review was conducted;

(5) The date the decision was issued;

(6) The principal reason or reasons for its decision;
and

(7) The rationale for its decision.

Upon receipt of a notice of a decision
reversing the adverse action, the health carrier immediately shall approve
coverage of the recommended or requested health care service or treatment that
was the subject of the adverse action.

(s) For an expedited external review, within
forty-eight hours after the date it receives the opinion of each clinical
reviewer, the assigned independent review organization, in accordance with
subsection (t), shall make a decision and provide notice of the decision orally
or in writing to the enrollee, the enrollee's appointed representative, the
health carrier, and the commissioner.

If the notice provided was not in writing,
within forty-eight hours after the date of providing that notice, the assigned
independent review organization shall provide written confirmation of the
decision to the enrollee, the enrollee's appointed representative, the health
carrier, and the commissioner.

(t) If a majority of the clinical reviewers
recommends that the recommended or requested health care service or treatment
should be covered, the independent review organization shall make a decision to
reverse the health carrier's adverse determination or final adverse
determination.

If a majority of the clinical reviewers
recommends that the recommended or requested health care service or treatment
should not be covered, the independent review organization shall make a
decision to uphold the health carrier's adverse determination or final adverse
determination.

If the clinical reviewers are evenly split as
to whether the recommended or requested health care service or treatment should
be covered, the independent review organization shall obtain the opinion of an
additional clinical reviewer in order for the independent review organization
to make a decision based on the opinions of a majority of the clinical
reviewers. The additional clinical reviewer shall use the same information to
reach an opinion as the clinical reviewers who have already submitted their
opinions. The selection of the additional clinical reviewer shall not extend
the time within which the assigned independent review organization is required
to make a decision based on the opinions of the clinical reviewers selected. [L
2011, c 230, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 45, §12; am L 2015, c 63, §19]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next